Hawaii statutes.
§286-305 Contents and
characteristics; form. (a) Each identification card issued by the
examiner of drivers shall display a distinguishing number assigned to the
cardholder, and shall display the following inscription:

"STATE
OF HAWAII IDENTIFICATION CARD"

(b) The examiner of drivers, after obtaining
the fingerprint of the applicant as provided in this part and after obtaining
the information required by or pursuant to this part, shall issue to each
applicant an identification card in a form and with identifying information
that the director deems necessary and appropriate, including a notation of
veteran status, if desired by the applicant, on the front of the card where
applicable; provided that such notation shall not include any designation other
than the term "veteran". As used in this subsection, "veteran"
means any person who served in any of the uniformed services of the United
States and was discharged under conditions other than dishonorable.

(c) The identification card shall not display
the cardholder's social security number.

(d) The identification card shall be designed
to prevent its reproduction or alteration without ready detection.

(e) The identification card for individuals
under twenty-one years of age shall have characteristics prescribed by the
examiner distinguishing it from that issued to a individual who is twenty-one
years of age or older. [L 2012, c 310, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 6, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next